incubator/apertium-hi-ur.hi.dix
    <pardef n="छ्/ऊ__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊकर</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊना</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊने</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊनी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊनीं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊता</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊते</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊती</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊतीं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उआ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उए</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उये</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उई</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उईं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयीं</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उये</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उए</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइये</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइए</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उये</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उए</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएँ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उओ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइये</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइए</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएँ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उऊँगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयेगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइएगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइयेगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयेगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएँगे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयेंगे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उओगे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइएगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइयेगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएँगे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयेंगे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उऊँगी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उएगी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयेगी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइएगा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उइयेगा</l>

    <e lm="चू"><i>च्</i><par n="छ्/ऊ__व्"/></e>
    <e lm="छू"><i>छ्</i><par n="छ्/ऊ__व्"/></e>
